Idaho, session 2025, H0041.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 1, Title 33, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 33-143, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
33-143. DISPLAY OF FLAGS AND BANNERS ON PUBLIC SCHOOL PROPERTY. (1)
The purpose of this section is to ensure that flags and banners displayed on
public school property do not promote political, religious, or ideological
viewpoints in order to maintain a neutral and inclusive environment for all
students.
(2) No flags or banners that represent political, religious, or ideo-
logical views, including but not limited to political parties, race, gen-
der, sexual orientation, or political ideologies, may be displayed on public
school property such as classrooms, hallways, entryways, or sports fields.
(3) The provisions of subsection (2) of this section shall not apply to:
(a) Official flags or banners representing the United States;
(b) Official flags of any state in the United States;
(c) Official flags of the United States military;
(d) Official flags of Idaho Indian tribes;
(e) Official flags of recognized foreign nations with which the United
States is not engaged in hostile action;
(f) Achievement flags or banners recognized by the Idaho state depart-
ment of education;
(g) Flags or banners representing official school mascots and colors;
(h) Electronic displays within the school;
(i) Personal items such as pins or shirts worn by students; and
(j) Displays in the school parking lot.
(4) The Idaho state department of education shall oversee the enforce-
ment of this section. Schools found in violation of this section shall be re-
quired to remove unauthorized flags or banners.
(5) As used in this section:
(a) "Banner" means a long, rectangular, or square piece of fabric, pa-
per, or other material, often displayed in a vertical or horizontal man-
ner, used to convey a message, symbol, emblem, or representation of an
institution or a political, religious, or ideological expression, or
used to announce or celebrate an event or achievement.


(b) "Display" means to keep a flag or banner visible on school property
beyond a brief curriculum-based educational purpose.
(c) "Flag" means a piece of fabric or similar material, typically rect-
angular or square, attached to a pole or staff and used as a symbol, em-
blem, or representation of a country, state, tribe, institution, or any
political, religious, or ideological expression.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.